Hawaii statutes.
[§328J‑2] Prohibition in facilities
owned by the State or the counties. Smoking shall be prohibited in all
enclosed or partially enclosed areas, including buildings and vehicles owned,
leased, or operated by the State or any county. [L 2006, c 295, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next